Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$14,103,674 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal  funds, collected or received by the Real Estate
Agency.
SECTION 2. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 21, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5536 (SB 5536-A) Page 1